apertium-cux.cux.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>
%<v%>
%<np%>
%<adv%>
%<det%>
%<prn%>
%<num%>
%<cnjcoo%>
%<cnjsub%>
%<x%>
%<pr%>

%<tv%>

%<pot%>
%<cont%>
%<perf%>
%<impf%>

%<pers%>

%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>

%<sg%>
%<pl%>

%<px1sg%>
%<px2sg%>
%<px3sg%>
%<px1pl%>
%<px2pl%>
%<px3pl%>

%<in%>
%<ex%>

%<s_sg1%>
%<s_sg2%>
%<s_sg3%>
%<s_pl1%>
%<s_pl2%>
%<s_pl3%>

%<ant%>

%<m%>
%<f%>

%<frm%>

%<hu%>
%<aa%>
%<nn%>

%<sent%>

%{a%}
%{I%}
%{u%}
%{h%}
%{e%}
%{ː%}
%{˨%}
%{˦%}
%{i%}


LEXICON Root

Sustantivos ;
Propios ;
Miscellanea ;
Adverbios ;
Determinantes ;
Pronombres ;
Numerales ;
Prefijos ;
Punctuación ;


LEXICON Prefijos 

TAM ; 

LEXICON TAM 
! V-: kw-, x-, k-, nt-
! V-: kw-, x-, ch-, nt- 
! C-: ku-, i-, ki-, ni-
! C-: ku-, i-, chi-, ni-
! C-: ku-, i-, ke-, ni-

! Clase I:
! k{U}
! {x}
! ch(i)
! n{i}

! Clase II:
! 

TAM-V ; 
TAM-CV ; 
TAM-VCV ; 
TAM-CVCV ;

LEXICON TAM-V

%<pot%>:k%{u%}%> STEM-V ; 
%<cont%>:j%{i%}%> STEM-V ; 
%<perf%>:c%{h%}%> STEM-V ; 

LEXICON TAM-CV

%<pot%>:k%{u%}%> STEM-CV ; 
%<cont%>:j%{i%}%> STEM-CV ; 
%<perf%>:chi%> STEM-CV ; 

LEXICON TAM-VCV

%<pot%>:k%{u%}%{a%}%> STEM-VCV ; 
%<cont%>:j%{i%}%> STEM-VCV ; 
%<perf%>:ch%{i%}%> STEM-VCV ;

LEXICON TAM-CVCV

%<pot%>: STEM-CVCV ; 
%<cont%>:j%{i%}%> STEM-CVCV ; 
%<perf%>: STEM-CVCV ;


!LEXICON TAM-II
!
!%<cont%>:h%> Verbos ; 
!%<impf%>:j%> Verbos ;
!%<perf%>:ch%> Verbos ;

LEXICON V 

%<v%>%<tv%>%<s_sg1%>:%>%{ː%}%{˦%}                # ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<s_sg1%>:                            # ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<s_sg2%>:%>d                         # ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<s_sg3%>%<m%>:%>s                    # ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<s_sg3%>%<f%>:%>ta                   # ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<s_sg3%>%<f%>:%>tʼa                  # ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<s_sg3%>%<aa%>:%>t                   # ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<s_pl1%>:%>%{u%}                     # ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<s_pl1%>%<in%>:%>n                   # ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<s_pl2%>:%>n                         # ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<s_pl3%>:%>y                         # ;


LEXICON POSS

%<px1sg%>:%{˦%} # ; ! tono alto
%<px2sg%>:%>d # ;
%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>n # ;
%<px3sg%>%<aa%>:%>t # ;
%<px3sg%>%<m%>:%>s # ;
%<px3sg%>%<f%>:%>ta # ;
%<px1pl%>%<ex%>:%>nhúu # ; 
%<px1pl%>%<in%>:%>oh # ; 
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>n # ;

LEXICON N1

%<n%>: # ; 
%<n%>: POSS ; 

LEXICON N2

%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON N3

%<n%>: # ;


LEXICON ANT

%<np%>%<ant%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV 

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON DET

%<det%>: # ;

LEXICON PREP

%<pr%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC 

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON Personales 

ú%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ú # ;
ú%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:uu # ;
di%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:di # ;
sakoon%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sp%>:sakoon # ;
tʼakoon%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sp%>:tʼakoon # ;
ya%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<hu%>%<frm%>%<sp%>:ya # ;
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<hu%>%<sp%>:%{˨%} # ; ! tono bajo
itkon%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<aa%>%<sp%>:itkon # ; ! animal
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<nn%>%<sp%>: # ; 
uun%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<in%>%<pl%>:uun # ;
nsun%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<ex%>%<pl%>:nsun # ;
nsen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:nsen # ;
tasen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<pl%>:tasen # ;

LEXICON PRON-POSS 

%<prn%>: # ;
%<prn%>: POSS ;

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Miscellanea


no:no PREP ; ! "en"
ntuku:ntuku PREP ; ! "con"
ntuku:ntu PREP ; ! "con"
miku:miku  CC ; ! "y"
miku:mi  CC ; ! "y"
ne:ne CC ; ! "y"
tin:tin CC ; ! "pero"
chi:chi CS ; ! "que"
jobche:jobche CS ; ! "cuando"

LEXICON Determinantes

nukue:nukue DET ; ! "todos"

LEXICON Pronombres 

Personales ;

ñeʼe:ñeʼe PRON-POSS ;

LEXICON Numerales 

ama:ama NUM ; ! "uno"
uvi:uvi NUM ; ! "dos"
inu:inu NUM ; ! "tres"
kun:kun NUM ; ! "cuatro"
xuhun:xuhun NUM ; ! "cinco"

LEXICON Sustantivos 

koʼo:koʼo N1 ; ! "pie"
! koʼólïd ! "piecito"
ti:ti     N1 ; ! "cabeza"
chaku:chaku     N1 ; ! "madre"
yana:yana N2 ; ! "perro"
si:si N2 ; ! "niño"
silï:silï N2 ; ! "niñito"
ñu:ñu N2 ; ! "maíz"
ninu:ninu N2 ; ! "maíz"
bʼiku:bʼiku N2 ; ! "fiesta"
zangatan:zangatan N2 ; ! "coyote"
deabea:deabea N2 ; ! "luz"
maa:maa N2 ; ! "oscuridad"
iyu:iyu N2 ; ! "mes"
poon:poon N2 ; ! "pan"
kubi:kubi N2 ; ! "lluvia"
tuʼu:tuʼu N2 ; ! "pollo"
tibin:tibin N2 ; ! "hermana"
escuela:escuela N3 ; ! "escuela"
dulce:dulce N3 ; ! "escuela"
bachiyeraton:bachiyeraton N3 ; ! "bachillerato"

LEXICON Propios

Foon:Foon ANT ; ! "Juan"
Juan:Juan ANT ; ! "Juan"

LEXICON Adverbios

ngua:ngua                ADV ; ! "no"
jinknóʼö:jinknóʼö        ADV ; ! "a mediodía"
yabi:yabi                ADV ; ! "anoche"
iku:iku                  ADV ; ! "ayer"
jobjòbè:jobjòbè          ADV ; ! "diario"
después:después          ADV ; ! "después"
kata:kata                ADV ; ! "todavía"
ndoyndoyo:ndoyndoyo      ADV ; ! "cada año"

LEXICON STEM-V 

a:a V ; ! "comprar"
oʼo:oʼo V ; ! "dar"
eʼe:eʼe V ; ! "ir"
ee:ee V ; ! "estudiar"

LEXICON STEM-CV 

di:di V ; ! "sobar"
ndʼa:ndʼa V ; ! "perderse"
ka:ka V ; ! "pedir"
neʼe:neʼe V ; ! "querer"
ngu:ngu V ; ! "moler"
nu:nu V ; ! "matar"
nú:nu V ; ! "ir"
ta:ta V ; ! "cantar"
nyuu:nyuu V ; ! "tejer"
nde:nde V ; ! "bailar"

LEXICON STEM-VCV

ika:%{I%}ka V ; ! "caminar"
inu:%{I%}nu V ; ! "ver"
enu:%{e%}nu V ; ! "correr"
di:di V ; ! "sacudir"

LEXICON STEM-CVCV

diñu:diñu V ; ! "meter"
ndúchi:ndúchi V ; ! "jugar"
ndúku:ndúku V ; ! "robar"
tokʼa:tokʼa V ; ! "enfermar"

!LEXICON Verbos

!ai:ai V ; ! "comprar"
!aku:aku V ; ! "cubrir"
!yado:yado V ; ! "dormir"

!cheʼe:cheʼe V ; ! "comer"          ! che³ʔe³,ge³ʔe³,che¹ʔe¹,nche³ʔe³,
!ine:ine V ; ! "hablar"             ! ka¹nne¹,yi¹nne¹,chi¹nne¹,nne³¹
!idijun:idijun V ; ! "escribir"       

!LEXICON Irregulares



LEXICON Punctuación

%.%<sent%>:%. # ;
%¿%<sent%>:%¿ # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%,%<cm%>:%, # ;

! ú jita - ún chita
! dín jitod - dín chitad
